Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-732
Defective corporations; dissolution; procedure.

Any corporation which purports to have been incorporated or reincorporated under sections 70-701 to 70-738, but which has not complied with all of the requirements for legal corporate existence, may nevertheless file a certificate of dissolution in the same manner as a validly existing corporation. The certificate of dissolution in such case may be authorized by a majority of the incorporators or directors at a meeting called by any incorporator upon ten days' notice mailed to the last-known post office address of each incorporator or director, and held at the principal office of the corporation named in the articles of incorporation.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 28, p. 211;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-828;

R.S.1943, § 70-732.